Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.183

Annual increase amount—Legislature's rights reserved—No additional increases after June 30, 2011.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined in RCW 41.40.010(4) shall be increased by an amount equal to $0.40 per month per year of service minus the 2008 gain-sharing increase amount under *RCW 41.31.010 as it exists on July 22, 2007. This adjustment shall not decrease the annual increase amount, and is not to exceed $0.20 per month per year of service. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has the contractual right to receive this adjustment to the annual increase amount not granted prior to that time.

(2) The adjustment to the annual increase amount as set forth in section 11, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a replacement benefit for gain-sharing. If the repeal of **chapter 41.31 RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then this adjustment to the annual increase amount shall not be included in future annual increase amounts paid on or after the date of such reinstatement.

(3) No additional increase under this section shall be provided after June 30, 2011.

[ 2011 c 362 s 5; 2007 c 491 s 11.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.31.010 was repealed by 2007 c 491 s 13, effective January 2, 2008.

**(2) Chapter 41.31 RCW was repealed by 2007 c 491 s 13, effective January 2, 2008.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2011 c 362: See notes following RCW 41.32.483.

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.